Wisconsin, session 2025, AB503.
do enact as follows:AB503,11Section 1. 94.55 (1) of the statutes is renumbered 94.55 (1) (intro.) and 2amended to read:AB503,2,3394.55 (1) Definition Definitions. (intro.) In this section, “hemp”:AB503,2,124(a) “Hemp” means the plant Cannabis sativa L. and any part of that plant, 5including the seeds thereof and all derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, 6acids, salts, and salts of isomers, whether growing or not, with a delta-9-7tetrahydrocannabinol total tetrahydrocannabinol concentration, including 8tetrahydrocannabinolic acid, of not more than 0.3 percent in the plant on a dry 9weight basis or the maximum concentration allowed under federal law up to 1 10percent, whichever is greater, as tested using post-decarboxylation or other 11similarly reliable methods. “Hemp” includes industrial hemp. “Hemp” does not 12include a any of the following:AB503,2,14133. A prescription drug product that has been approved by the U.S. food and 14drug administration. AB503,215Section 2. 94.55 (1) (a) 1. of the statutes is created to read:AB503,2,181694.55 (1) (a) 1. A viable seed from a Cannabis sativa L. plant that exceeds a 17total tetrahydrocannabinol concentration, including tetrahydrocannabinolic acid, of 180.3 percent in the plant on a dry weight basis.AB503,319Section 3. 94.55 (1) (a) 2. of the statutes is created to read:AB503,2,212094.55 (1) (a) 2. A hemp-derived cannabinoid product that contains any of the 21following:AB503,2,2322a. A cannabinoid that is not capable of being naturally produced by a 23Cannabis sativa L. plant.AB503,3,21b. A cannabinoid that is capable of being naturally produced by a Cannabis 2sativa L. plant but that was synthesized or manufactured outside of the plant.AB503,3,63c. A quantifiable amount, based on substance, form, manufacture, or article, 4of a tetrahydrocannabinol, including tetrahydrocannabinolic acid, or another 5cannabinoid that has similar effects or is marketed to have similar effects on 6humans or animals as tetrahydrocannabinol.AB503,47Section 4. 94.55 (1) (b) of the statutes is created to read:AB503,3,14894.55 (1) (b) “Hemp-derived cannabinoid product” means an intermediate or 9final product that is derived from hemp other than industrial hemp, that contains 10cannabinoids in any form, and that is intended for human or animal use through 11any means of application or administration, including inhalation, ingestion, or 12topical application. “Hemp-derived cannabinoid product” does not include a 13prescription drug product that has been approved by the U.S. food and drug 14administration.AB503,515Section 5. 94.55 (1) (c) of the statutes is created to read:AB503,3,161694.55 (1) (c) “Industrial hemp” means any of the following:AB503,3,19171. Hemp grown for the use of the stalk of the plant, fiber produced from such 18a stalk, or any other noncannabinoid derivative, mixture, preparation, or 19manufacture of such a stalk.AB503,3,22202. Hemp grown for the use of the whole grain, oil, cake, nut, hull, or any other 21noncannabinoid compound, derivative, mixture, preparation, or manufacture of the 22seeds of such a plant.AB503,4,2233. Hemp grown for purposes of producing microgreens or other edible hemp 24leaf products intended for human consumption that are derived from an immature 1hemp plant that is grown from seeds that do not exceed the threshold for total 2tetrahydrocannabinol concentration in par. (a).AB503,4,534. A hemp plant that does not enter the stream of commerce and that is 4intended to support hemp research at an institution of higher education or at an 5independent research institute.AB503,4,765. Hemp that is grown for the use of a viable seed of the plant produced solely 7for the production or manufacture of any material described in subds. 1. to 4.AB503,68Section 6. 94.55 (2) (b) 2m. b. of the statutes is amended to read:AB503,4,11994.55 (2) (b) 2m. b. A procedure for testing, using post-decarboxylation or 10other similarly reliable methods, delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol 11tetrahydrocannabinol concentration levels of hemp.AB503,712Section 7. 94.55 (2) (b) 4s. of the statutes is amended to read:AB503,4,171394.55 (2) (b) 4s. Following any required sampling and testing, or if the 14department determines that sampling and testing are not required, the department 15shall issue a certificate that states that the hemp has been tested or is not required 16to be tested for delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol tetrahydrocannabinol concentration 17and is in compliance with this section and rules promulgated under this section.AB503,818Section 8. 94.55 (3m) (a) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB503,4,221994.55 (3m) (a) 2. Knowingly make an inaccurate claim about the content, 20delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol tetrahydrocannabinol concentration, quality, or 21origin of hemp or a hemp product in the course of transferring or selling the hemp or 22hemp product.AB503,923Section 9. 94.67 (15c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB503,4,242494.67 (15c) “Hemp” has the meaning given in s. 94.55 (1) (a).AB503,101Section 10. 446.01 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:AB503,5,82446.01 (2) (a) To examine into the fact, condition, or cause of departure from 3complete health and proper condition of the human; to treat without the use of 4drugs as defined in s. 450.01 (10), other than hemp, as defined under s. 94.55 (1) (a), 5or surgery; to counsel; to advise for the same for the restoration and preservation of 6health or to undertake, offer, advertise, announce or hold out in any manner to do 7any of the aforementioned acts, for compensation, direct or indirect or in 8expectation thereof; andAB503,119Section 11. 450.03 (1) (k) of the statutes is amended to read:AB503,5,1210450.03 (1) (k) A person who sells, gives away, or barters hemp, as defined in s. 1194.55 (1) (a), or takes any of the actions described in s. 450.01 (16) (a) to (k) in 12relation to hemp.AB503,1213Section 12. 450.07 (1m) of the statutes is amended to read:AB503,5,1514450.07 (1m) A license is not required under this section for a person to engage 15in the manufacturing of hemp, as defined in s. 94.55 (1) (a).AB503,1316Section 13. 961.01 (14) of the statutes is amended to read:AB503,6,217961.01 (14) “Marijuana” means all parts of the plants of the genus Cannabis, 18whether growing or not; the seeds thereof; the resin extracted from any part of the 19plant; and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture or preparation of 20the plant, its seeds or resin, including tetrahydrocannabinols. “Marijuana” does 21include the mature stalks if mixed with other parts of the plant, but does not 22include fiber produced from the stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant, 23any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture or preparation of the 24mature stalks (except the resin extracted therefrom), fiber, oil or cake or the 1sterilized seed of the plant which is incapable of germination. “Marijuana” does not 2include hemp, as defined in s. 94.55 (1) (a).AB503,143Section 14. 961.14 (4) (t) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:AB503,6,54961.14 (4) (t) 3. Tetrahydrocannabinols contained in hemp, as defined in s. 594.55 (1) (a).AB503,156Section 15. 961.32 (2m) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:AB503,6,137961.32 (2m) (b) An individual may possess a cannabidiol product if the 8individual has certification stating that the individual possesses a cannabidiol 9product to treat a medical condition, if the certification has an issue date that is no 10more than one year prior to the possession, and if any expiration date provided by 11the physician in the certification has not passed. A certification is not required to 12possess hemp, as defined in s. 94.55 (1) (a), or a prescription drug product that has 13been approved by the U.S. food and drug administration.AB503,1614Section 16. 961.32 (3) (a) 2. of the statutes is amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab503 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab503 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB503 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB503 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB503: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting